Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2071.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
1177 SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
1188 in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2-5-131 of Title 27A, unless
1199 there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
2200 A. The intentional injection, release, or dispersion, by any
2211 means, of chemicals, chemical compounds, substances, or apparatus
2222 within the borders of this state into the atmosphere with express
2233 purpose of affecting temperature, weather, or the intensity of
2244 sunlight is prohibited.
Req. No. 12552 Page 1

11 B. The Governor may direct the Oklahoma Air National Guard to
22 interdict, document identification tail numbers, secure photographic
33 evidence, sample aerosolized effluents or particulate, utilize mass
44 spectrometers and other appropriate scientific instrumentation, and
55 engage with aircraft violating this section to escort them to the
66 nearest airport for investigation, securing of evidence, and
77 documentation of violation.
88 SECTION 2. REPEALER 82 O.S. 2021, Sections 1087.1,
99 1087.2, 1087.3, 1087.4, 1087.5, 1087.6, 1087.7, 1087.8, 1087.9,
1100 1087.10, 1087.11, 1087.12, 1087.13, 1087.14, 1087.15, 1087.16,
1111 1087.17, 1087.18, 1087.19, 1087.20, 1801.1, 1801.2, and 1801.4, are
1122 hereby repealed.
1133 SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
1144
1155 60-1-12552 JBH 02/11/25
1166
1177
1188
1199
2200
2211
2222
2233
2244
Req. No. 12552 Page 2